Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-609
Resisting officer or employee of commission; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to resist or obstruct any officer or any employee of the commission in the discharge of his or her lawful duties. Any person willfully resisting such officer or employee shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1929, c. 112, VI, § 4, p. 434;

C.S.1929, § 37-604;

Laws 1937, c. 89, § 15, p. 299;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 37-604;

R.S.1943, § 37-604;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 199;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-604;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 299.